Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.901

Application—1992 c 223.

RCW 39.76.011, 60.28.011, 60.28.021, 60.28.051, 39.04.250, and 39.04.900 are applicable to all public works contracts entered into on or after September 1, 1992, relating to the construction of any work of improvement.

[ 2009 c 219 s 1; 1992 c 223 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 223: See note following RCW 39.76.011.